test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kihcokiniy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kihcôkiniy - ok : # -m animate noun, tomato, Wolvengrey
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg: kihcôkiniy
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikihcôkiniy
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikihcôkiniy
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okihcôkiniya
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okihcôkinîyiwa
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikihcôkinînân
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikihcôkinînaw
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikihcôkinîwâw
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okihcôkinîwâwa
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okihcôkinîyiwa
     
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl: kihcôkiniyak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikihcôkiniyak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikihcôkiniyak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okihcôkiniya
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okihcôkinîyiwa
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikihcôkinînânak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikihcôkinînawak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikihcôkinîwâwak
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okihcôkinîwâwa
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okihcôkinîyiwa
     
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Obv: kihcôkiniya
     
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Loc: [kihcôkinîhk, kihcôkiniyinâhk]
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikihcôkinîhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikihcôkinîhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okihcôkinîhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: okihcôkinîyihk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikihcôkinînâhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikihcôkinînâhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikihcôkinîwâhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okihcôkinîwâhk
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: okihcôkinîyihk
     
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [kihcôkinîs, kihcôkinîsis]
     kihcôkiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [kihcôkinîsak, kihcôkinîsisak]
